Hawaii statutes.
§437-11 Additional requirements for
dealer's and auction's license. (a) Requirements to be met before
issuance of dealer's and auction's license.

(1) The following requirements shall be met by an
applicant for a dealer's license before a license may be issued by the motor
vehicle industry licensing board:

(A) The applicant has a site which will be
used primarily for the purpose of selling, displaying, offering for sale, or
otherwise dealing in motor vehicles;

(B) The site has a permanent building thereon
suitable for the display at any one time of at least three motor vehicles
having an average base of at least ninety inches; and

(C) The site has suitable sanitation
facilities.

(2) The following requirements shall be met by an
applicant for an auction's license before a license may be issued by the motor
vehicle industry licensing board:

(A) The applicant has a permanent site which
will be used primarily for the purpose of selling, displaying, offering for
sale, or otherwise dealing in motor vehicles; and

(B) The site has suitable sanitation
facilities.

(b) Other related uses permissible. The site
may be used for other purposes which are accessory or customarily associated
with the retail sale of motor vehicles, such as maintenance operation of a
repair, accessories, gasoline and oil, storage, parts, service, or paint branch
or department. [L 1963, c 199, §1h; Supp, §160-167.1; HRS §437-11; am L 1969, c
263, §1(22); am L 1970, c 82, §1(3); am L 1992, c 153, §4; am L 1997, c 38, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next